Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1761.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5607(e) of Title 53 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding paragraphs to read:§ 5607. Purposes and powers.* * *(e) Prohibition.--* * *(4) An authority that furnishes water to or for the public shall not impose a standby charge on volunteer fire companies, nonprofit rescue squads and nonprofit ambulance services that are owners or occupants of structures equipped with automatic fire protection systems and are ratepayers of 123456789101112131415161718 record for costs associated with automatic fire protection systems. Charges to volunteer fire companies, nonprofit rescue squads and nonprofit ambulance services that are in effect on the effective date of this subparagraph shall continue to be charged until the conclusion of the next billing cycle.(5) As used in this subsection, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Cost of service." The actual water usage and capital investment made by a municipality specifically for the purpose of rendering fire protection service assessed against the owner of a residential or commercial structure for the reason that the structure is equipped with an automatic fire protection system."Standby charge." An amount in addition to the cost of service.* * *Section 2. Section 1326 of Title 66 is amended to read:§ 1326. Standby charge prohibited.(a) Prohibition.--A public utility that furnishes water to or for the public shall not impose a standby charge on [owners]:(1) Owners of residential structures equipped with automatic fire protection systems.(2) Volunteer fire companies, nonprofit rescue squads and nonprofit ambulance services that are owners or occupants of structures equipped with automatic fire protection systems and are ratepayers of record for costs associated with automatic fire protection systems.(a.1) Effect on current rates.--Charges to volunteer fire 20250HB1761PN2169 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 companies, nonprofit rescue squads and nonprofit ambulance services that are in effect on the effective date of this subsection shall continue to be charged until conclusion of the public utility's next general rate proceeding.(b) [Definition.--As used in this section, the term "standby charge" means an amount, in addition to the regular rate, assessed against the owner of a residential structure for the reason that the residential structure is equipped with an automatic fire protection system.] Definitions.-- As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Cost of service." The actual water usage and capital investment made by a public utility specifically for the purpose of rendering fire protection service assessed against the owner of a residential or commercial structure for the reason that the structure is equipped with an automatic fire protection system."Standby charge." An amount, in addition to the cost of service, under subsection (a.1).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1761PN2169 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920